Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 3. County and Prosecuting Attorneys

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 202, § 1, appropriates $300,000 to the attorney general from the general fund to fund a special prosecution account to assist individual counties in the prosecution of criminal defendants in cases where the extraordinary actual costs of prosecution is unusually expensive, as defined by rules and regulations of the attorney general. Funds in the special prosecution account are to be disbursed at the discretion of the attorney general only after written request of a prosecuting attorney, who must submit supporting budget information for the prosecutor's actual prosecution expenses along with projected costs of prosecution for the case involved. Funds in the special prosecution account are not to be used for expenses of the office of the attorney general.

Laws 2005, ch. 202, § 2, makes the act is effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Cross references. —

For provision exempting county attorney from provision requiring county officers to be kept at county seat, see §

18-3-103

.

For authority and duties of county attorneys relative to criminal procedure generally, see title 7.

For duty of county attorney relative to Pure Seed Law, see §

11-12-118

.

As to duty of county attorney to defend contested ballot proposition in countywide proposition, see §

22-17-107

.

For duty of county attorney to institute proceedings against parties permitting waste water to damage, etc., highways, upon report of road supervisor, see §

24-1-116

.

For duties of county attorney relative to mentally ill persons generally, see title 25.

For duties of county attorneys in relation to labor and employment generally, see title 27.

For duty of county attorneys to represent Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission when called upon by commission, see §

30-5-103

.

For duties of county attorneys in relation to public health and safety generally, see title 35.

For duties of county attorneys in relation to public utilities generally, see title 37.

For duties of county attorneys relative to trade and commerce generally, see title 40.

For duty of county attorney to appear and defend division superintendent or water commissioner in matters pertaining to water, see §

41-3-604

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 90, 91, 235; 63C Am. Jur. 2d Prosecuting Attorneys § 1 et seq.

Validity, under state law, of appointment of independent special prosecutor to handle political or controversial prosecutions or investigations of persons other than regular prosecutor, 84 ALR3d 29.

Validity, under state law, of appointment of special prosecutor where regular prosecutor is charged with, or being investigated for, criminal or impeachable offense, 84 ALR3d 115.

Availability of writ of prohibition or similar remedy against acts of public prosecutor, 16 ALR4th 112.

27 C.J.S. District and Prosecuting Attorneys § 1 et seq.

§ 18-3-301.
Office created; qualifications; certificate of election; counties empowered to consolidate.

In judicial districts in which the office of district attorney has not been created there shall be elected in each county a county and prosecuting attorney who at the time of his nomination and election and during his term of office, shall be a member of the bar of this state. A copy of his certificate of election and oath shall be filed by the county and prosecuting attorney with the clerk of the district court for his county or counties. In those judicial districts in which the office of district attorney has been created the county commissioners shall appoint an attorney to the office of county attorney for a term of one (1) year, who may be reappointed on a year-to-year basis. The county commissioners may remove the county attorney for cause.

The boards of county commissioners of two (2) or more contiguous counties not served by a district attorney may by resolution consolidate the offices of, and agree to be served by, a single county and prosecuting attorney who shall be elected by a vote of the electors of all the counties within the consolidated area.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. VIII, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1893; R.S. 1899, § 1103; C.S. 1910, § 1204; Laws 1915, ch. 3, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1450; Laws 1925, ch. 33, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 30-401; C.S. 1945, § 27-601; W.S. 1957, § 18-109; Laws 1975, ch. 195, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Sections 1, 2, ch. 195, Laws 1975, would have amended or enacted provisions of W.S. 1957 similar to this section, effective January 1, 1978. However, § 1, ch. 124, Laws 1977, revised such provisions, also effective January 1, 1978.

Quoted in

State v. Wyo. State Hosp. (In re RB), 2013 WY 15,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb. 6, 2013).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of attorney acting in official capacity to dismiss or otherwise terminate action, 56 ALR2d 1290.

Prosecuting attorney as a witness in criminal case, 54 ALR3d 100.

Power of private citizen to institute criminal proceedings without authorization or approval by prosecuting attorney, 66 ALR3d 732.

Immunity of prosecuting attorney or similar officer from action for false arrest or imprisonment, 79 ALR3d 882.

Disqualification of prosecuting attorney in state criminal case on account of relationship with accused, 42 ALR5th 581.

§ 18-3-302.
Duties generally; employment of other attorneys by county.

Each county attorney shall:

Act in all courts in the state as legal counsel for his county or counties and its officers acting in their official capacity and prosecute or defend all suits instituted by or against his county or counties or its officers;

Give his opinion in writing upon the request of any county officer of his county or counties, without fee, upon all questions of law relating to the duties of such officer and file and preserve in his office a copy of all such opinions;

Examine the bonds offered by every county officer before the bonds are approved by the board of county commissioners and report in writing to the board of county commissioners or to the judge of the district court whether the bonds are executed as required by law;

Perform other duties as prescribed by law.

In any county in a judicial district in which the office of district attorney has not been created, the county and prosecuting attorney shall have the jurisdiction, responsibilities, and duties of the district attorney and of the county attorney.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the county commissioners of any county or consolidation of counties from employing one (1) or more attorneys to appear and prosecute or defend or assist the county and prosecuting attorney in behalf of the people of the state or such county or consolidation of counties in any action or proceeding, whether civil or criminal. In such case, the nature and necessity of the employment shall appear in the record of the board or boards. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the board of county commissioners of a county which has consolidated from independently employing one (1) or more attorneys to serve their respective counties.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. VIII, §§ 2, 3; Laws 1879, ch. 8, § 2; 1882, ch. 45, § 18; R.S. 1887, §§ 1894, 1895, 1897; R.S. 1899, §§ 1104, 1106, 1108; C.S. 1910, §§ 1205, 1207, 1209; C.S. 1920, §§ 1451, 1453, 1455; Laws 1931, ch. 92, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-402, 30-404, 30-406; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-602, 27-604, 27-606; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-111, 18-113, 18-115; Laws 1973, ch. 146, § 1; 1975, ch. 195, § 2; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Section 2, ch. 195, Laws 1975, would have amended provisions of W.S. 1957 similar to this section, effective January 1, 1978. However, § 1, ch. 124, Laws 1977, revised such provisions, also effective January 1, 1978.

According to a previous compiler, § 2, ch. 8, Laws 1879, did not specifically amend § 2, art. VIII, ch. 28, C.L. 1876, but the 2 sections were combined as § 1104, R.S. 1899, and the combined sections were amended by § 1, ch. 92, Laws 1931. Section 2, ch. 8, Laws 1879, as originally enacted, appears herein as §

18-3-520

.

By ch. 163, Laws 1945, the county and prosecuting attorney was made juvenile delinquent officer in first class counties until the first Monday in January, 1947.

Scope of prosecutorial immunity in conduct of office. —

To the extent that the securing of information is necessary to a prosecutor's decision to initiate a criminal prosecution and in the preparation of said case, the shield of absolute immunity attaches and the prosecutor cannot be held liable for alleged tortious conduct. Blake v. Rupe, 651 P.2d 1096,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1982), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1208, 103 S. Ct. 1199, 75 L. Ed. 2d 442, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 3435 (U.S. 1983).

Argument by prosecuting attorney. —

The prosecuting attorney acts as attorney for the state and not in a judicial capacity, so that statement in argument on evidence, “I am going to ask you to convict a murderer,” is not erroneous, as a statement of opinion. Ross v. State, 8 Wyo. 351, 57 P. 924,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1899).

Prosecutors have no authority to grant immunity. —

A prosecuting attorney (district attorney or county attorney) in Wyoming has no authority to grant immunity to a witness. Hall v. State, 851 P.2d 1262,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1993).

Attorney's fee. —

County attorney was not entitled to additional fee for prosecuting action to abate liquor nuisance. State ex rel. Cone v. Bernweiser, 39 Wyo. 314, 271 P. 13,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1928).

The state, in proceeding to abate liquor nuisance, was not entitled to tax reasonable attorney's fees which statute allows successful complainant, as the compensation of the county attorney is covered by his salary. State ex rel. Cone v. Bernweiser, 39 Wyo. 314, 271 P. 13,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1928).

Private counsel. —

The board of county commissioners may engage private counsel, in absence of county attorney, or in case of his refusal to act. Board of Comm'rs v. Casper Nat'l Bank, 56 Wyo. 132, 105 P.2d 578,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1940).

County commissioners were authorized to employ an attorney to assist the board in suit brought to compel it to designate a particular paper as the official paper of the county. Appel v. State, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1900).

The board of commissioners is the judge of the necessity of employing an attorney to assist the county attorney, and its determination thereon can only be attacked for fraud. Appel v. State, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1900).

Use of special federal prosecutor. —

State's use of a federal prosecutor as a special prosecutor in the defendant's capital murder trial was not error under Wyo. Const. art. 6, § 19 or Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 18-3-302(c); under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-103(d)(i), review for error, including constitutional error, has been limited to the use of special prosecutors with a financial or personal interest in the prosecution. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

Costs for special prosecutors. —

Statute contemplates that “costs” on change of venue shall include reasonable allowance for special assistant prosecuting attorney. Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 40 Wyo. 144, 275 P. 102,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1929).

Change of venue. —

On change of venue in criminal case to another county, exceptions as to authority of county attorney of county where action was commenced to sign, verify and file pleading relating to a defect if any, appearing on its face, should be taken by motion to quash and were waived by defendant's plea of not guilty. State v. Kusel, 29 Wyo. 287, 213 P. 367,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1923).

Facts govern. —

Where county commissioners had no personal interest in suits and action was not against them individually, commissioners had power as board representing county to employ private attorneys to defend actions and to pay them, assertion in pleadings that county was not sued being a mere conclusion. The facts govern. Board of Comm'rs v. Casper Nat'l Bank, 56 Wyo. 132, 105 P.2d 578,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1940).

Individual interest, effect. —

Where county commissioners were charged with fraudulently conspiring to extort money from county treasury, being individually interested in action, they were unable to exercise proper discretion in employing private attorneys and could not impose liability on county for paying them. Board of Comm'rs v. Casper Nat'l Bank, 56 Wyo. 132, 105 P.2d 578,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1940).

Loss of jurisdiction. —

On change of venue the county from which the change was taken loses jurisdiction to proceed to try accused on a second information charging the same offense. Keefe v. District Court of Judicial Dist., 16 Wyo. 381, 94 P. 459,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1908).

Risk of accusation. —

When one accepts public office he assumes risk of defending himself even against unfounded accusations at own expense. Board of Comm'rs v. Casper Nat'l Bank, 56 Wyo. 132, 105 P.2d 578,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1940).

Unlawful trial. —

In prosecution before justice of the peace of an offense over which he had no jurisdiction save as an examining magistrate, where complaints were signed and sworn to before the county attorney, and the justice unlawfully tried the cause and imposed a fine without evidence that county was in any manner implicated in the proceedings, it was not liable in damages as for a tort. Houtz v. Board of Comm'rs, 11 Wyo. 152, 70 P. 840,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1902).

Stated

in

Hilderbrand v. Padget, 678 P.2d 870,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of attorney acting in official capacity to dismiss or otherwise terminate action, 56 ALR2d 1290.

§ 18-3-303.
Fees or salary; restriction upon employment; failure to perform official duties.

Each county attorney and their deputies shall receive such fees, salary or both as allowed by the board of county commissioners. When counties have consolidated the office of county and prosecuting attorney pursuant to W.S. 18-3-301(b) the salary of county and prosecuting attorneys shall be apportioned between the counties by agreement of the boards of county commissioners, but a county which has consolidated may independently employ a deputy county and prosecuting attorney. The boards of county commissioners of each county which have consolidated shall meet once every four (4) years to set such salaries.

The board of county commissioners, or boards of county commissioners when counties have consolidated pursuant to W.S. 18-3-301(b), may prohibit county and prosecuting attorneys or their deputies from engaging in the private practice of law directly or indirectly. This section shall not prohibit the county and prosecuting attorney from completing all civil cases not in conflict with the interests of the county or counties, in which he is counsel and pending in court before he takes office.

The county attorney shall not receive any fee from or prosecute or defend any individual or corporation in any civil or criminal suit or proceeding at law in which this state or his county or counties may be a party.

If the attorney fails, neglects or refuses to perform any official duties enjoined upon him by law he and his sureties are liable on his official bond in a sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) and not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), in the discretion of the court having jurisdiction.

Repealed by Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 3.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. VIII, § 4; Laws 1882, ch. 45, § 18; R.S. 1887, § 1896; R.S. 1899, § 1107; C.S. 1910, § 1208; C.S. 1920, § 1454; R.S. 1931, § 30-405; C.S. 1945, § 27-604; W.S. 1957, § 18-114; Laws 1975, ch. 195, § 2; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 21, § 3; Sp. Sess., ch. 22, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 69, § 203.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision that all state, city, county, town and school officers (with certain exceptions) shall be paid fixed and definite salaries, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

For provisions that legislature shall designate and fix salaries of county officers, see art. 14, § 3, Wyo. Const.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “once every four (4) years” for “not later than June 1, 1978, and each four (4) years thereafter.”

Editor's notes. —

Section 2, ch. 195, Laws 1975, would have amended provisions of W.S. 1957 similar to this section, effective January 1, 1978. However, § 1, ch. 124, Laws 1977, revised such provisions, also effective January 1, 1978.

Section 18, ch. 45, Laws 1882, did not specifically amend § 4, art. VIII, ch. 28, C.L. 1876. Prior to the enactment of ch. 45, Laws 1882, the first part of this section provided as follows: “Each county attorney shall receive such fees as may be allowed him by law, ….” Section 18, ch. 45, Laws 1882, provided a salary and fee schedule for county and prosecuting attorneys. As a result the compilers of the 1899 Revised Statutes inserted the words “and prosecuting” and “or salary or both.” The salary and fee schedule fixed by the 1882 act is now obsolete.

In general. —

The county and prosecuting attorney is attorney for the state and not the attorney for the defendant. Ross v. State, 8 Wyo. 351, 57 P. 924,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1899).

Injunction. —

Where an injunction was issued restraining the county and prosecuting attorney from prosecuting a party for violating the anti-gambling law, the bond or undertaking properly ran to the attorney individually, as neither the state nor the county was a party. Littleton v. Burgess, 16 Wyo. 58, 91 P. 832,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1907).

Applied

in

State v. Hambrick, 65 Wyo. 1, 196 P.2d 661,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1948).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Cone v. Bernweiser, 39 Wyo. 314, 271 P. 13,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(1928).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality and construction of statute prohibiting a prosecuting attorney from engaging in the private practice of law, 6 ALR3d 562.

Disqualification of prosecuting attorney in state criminal case on account of relationship with accused, 42 ALR5th 581.

§ 18-3-304.
Travel allowances.

When any county attorney is called upon to render services for the county outside of his county or consolidation of counties, or within his county or consolidation of counties at a distance of more than ten (10) miles from the county seat, or more than ten (10) miles from his own residence, he may in the discretion of the board or boards of county commissioners receive his actual and necessary traveling expenses as provided by W.S.

9-3-103

in attending to such services, in addition to his salary as county attorney.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 63, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1109; C.S. 1910, § 1210; C.S. 1920, § 1456; R.S. 1931, § 30-407; Laws 1935, ch. 41, § 1; 1939, ch. 100, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 27-607; W.S. 1957, § 18-116; Laws 1975, ch. 141, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; ch. 195, § 2; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “W.S.

9-3-103

” for “W.S. 9-1-118.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

Section 2, ch. 195, Laws 1977, would have amended provisions of W.S. 1957 similar to his section, effective January 1, 1978. However, § 1, ch. 124, Laws 1977, revised such provisions, also effective January 1, 1978.

Chapter 41, Laws 1935, consists of 5 sections and relates to fees and expenses of county attorneys, sheriffs, constables, witnesses and other public officers. For other sections of this act in this compilation, see the Table of Disposition of Acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

This section applies only when service is rendered for the county.

Wyoming State Treasurer ex rel. Workmen's Compensation Dep't v. Christiansen, 491 P.2d 1251,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 273

(Wyo. 1971).

§ 18-3-305.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1890, ch. 73, § 149, related to assistant prosecutors.